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DI−120 −DIAGNOSTICS ABS&VEHICLESTABILITYCONTROL(VSC)&
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM731E)

DTC C 1336 / 39 Zero Point Calibration of Deceleration
Sensor Undone

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C1236 / 39

When any of following 1. through 2. is detected:
1. In TEST mode, the shift lever is shifted to other then P

range with 2 sec. after ECU terminal IG1 is turned ON
for the first time.

2. When the deceleration sensor zero point recorded in
ECU is deleted.

SDecelerationsensor
SDecelerationsensorcircuit
SNeutral start switchcircuit (R range)
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Checkwhetherzeropointcalibrationofdecelerationsensorhasbeendoneor
not.

PREPARATION:
Shift theshift lever inPrangeand turn the ignitionswitchON, repeatconnectingandreleasingTsandE

1
terminals of check connector 4 times or more for 8 sec. After that do not move the vehicle for 15 sec. or more.
CHECK:
VSC TRC warning light remains on.

YES No problem.

2 Carry out deceleration sensor zero point calibration and confirm it by VSC TRC
warning light.

OK:
VSC TRC warning light blinks

OK No problem.

NG

3 Check DTC for the VSC (See page DI−4) .

*
1
:Other thanDTCC1336 /39 isoutput.

*
2
:DTCC1336 /39only isoutput.

*
1

RepairABScontrolsystemaccordingto the
code output.

*
2

4 Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between neutral start
switch (P range) and ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU and engine and ECT ECU (See
page IN−35).

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK
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5 Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between deceleration
sensor and ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU (See page IN−35).

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

6 Check deceleration sensor (See page DI−4) .

NG Replace deceleration sensor.

OK

Check and replace ABS & BA & TRC & VSC
ECU.


